Utah statutes.
63G-6a-1906.   Effect of prior determination by agents of state.

In any judicial action under Section 63G-6a-1802, determinations by employees, agents, or other persons appointed by the state shall be final and conclusive only as provided in Sections 63G-6a-1911, 63G-6a-1603, and 63G-6a-1705.



Amended by Chapter 91, 2012 General Session 

Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session, (Coordination Clause)

